Utah statutes.
35A-9-301.   Creation of the Utah Intergenerational Welfare Reform Commission.

There is created the Utah Intergenerational Welfare Reform Commission composed of:

(1)  the following five voting members:

(a)  the executive director of the Department of Workforce Services or the deputy director if designated by the executive director;

(b)  the executive director of the Department of Health or the deputy director if designated by the executive director;

(c)  the executive director of the Department of Human Services or the deputy director if designated by the executive director;

(d)  the state superintendent of public education or the deputy state superintendent if designated by the superintendent; and

(e)  the state juvenile court administrator; and

(2)  the chair of the Intergenerational Poverty Advisory Committee created by Section 35A-9-304, as a nonvoting member.



Enacted by Chapter 59, 2013 General Session

